Illinois, session 104th, HB5281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Protz-Liddy Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 7changing Section 6-204 as follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/6-204)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-204)9    Sec. 6-204. When court to forward license and reports. 10    (a) For the purpose of providing to the Secretary of State 11the records essential to the performance of the Secretary's 12duties under this Code to cancel, revoke or suspend the 13driver's license and privilege to drive motor vehicles of 14certain minors and of persons found guilty of the criminal 15offenses or traffic violations which this Code recognizes as 16evidence relating to unfitness to safely operate motor 17vehicles, the following duties are imposed upon public 18officials:19        (1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense 20    for which this Code makes mandatory the cancellation or 21    revocation of the driver's license or permit of such 22    person by the Secretary of State, the judge of the court in   HB5281 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    which such conviction is had shall require the surrender 2    to the clerk of the court of all driver's licenses or 3    permits then held by the person so convicted, and the 4    clerk of the court shall, within 5 days thereafter, 5    forward the same, together with a report of such 6    conviction, to the Secretary.7        (2) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense 8    under this Code or similar offenses under a municipal 9    ordinance, other than regulations governing standing, 10    parking or weights of vehicles, and excepting the 11    following enumerated Sections of this Code: Sections 12    11-1406 (obstruction to driver's view or control), 11-1407 13    (improper opening of door into traffic), 11-1410 (coasting 14    on downgrade), 11-1411 (following fire apparatus), 15    11-1419.01 (Motor Fuel Tax I.D. Card), 12-101 (driving 16    vehicle which is in unsafe condition or improperly 17    equipped), 12-201(a) (daytime lights on motorcycles), 18    12-202 (clearance, identification and side marker lamps), 19    12-204 (lamp or flag on projecting load), 12-205 (failure 20    to display the safety lights required), 12-401 21    (restrictions as to tire equipment), 12-502 (mirrors), 22    12-503 (windshields must be unobstructed and equipped with 23    wipers), 12-601 (horns and warning devices), 12-602 24    (mufflers, prevention of noise or smoke), 12-603 (seat 25    safety belts), 12-702 (certain vehicles to carry flares or 26    other warning devices), 12-703 (vehicles for oiling roads   HB5281 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    operated on highways), 12-710 (splash guards and 2    replacements), 13-101 (safety tests), 15-101 (size, weight 3    and load), 15-102 (width), 15-103 (height), 15-104 (name 4    and address on second division vehicles), 15-107 (length 5    of vehicle), 15-109.1 (cover or tarpaulin), 15-111 6    (weights), 15-112 (weights), 15-301 (weights), 15-316 7    (weights), 15-318 (weights), and also excepting the 8    following enumerated Sections of the Chicago Municipal 9    Code: Sections 27-245 (following fire apparatus), 27-254 10    (obstruction of traffic), 27-258 (driving vehicle which is 11    in unsafe condition), 27-259 (coasting on downgrade), 12    27-264 (use of horns and signal devices), 27-265 13    (obstruction to driver's view or driver mechanism), 27-267 14    (dimming of headlights), 27-268 (unattended motor 15    vehicle), 27-272 (illegal funeral procession), 27-273 16    (funeral procession on boulevard), 27-275 (driving freight 17    hauling vehicles on boulevard), 27-276 (stopping and 18    standing of buses or taxicabs), 27-277 (cruising of public 19    passenger vehicles), 27-305 (parallel parking), 27-306 20    (diagonal parking), 27-307 (parking not to obstruct 21    traffic), 27-308 (stopping, standing or parking 22    regulated), 27-311 (parking regulations), 27-312 (parking 23    regulations), 27-313 (parking regulations), 27-314 24    (parking regulations), 27-315 (parking regulations), 25    27-316 (parking regulations), 27-317 (parking 26    regulations), 27-318 (parking regulations), 27-319   HB5281 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    (parking regulations), 27-320 (parking regulations), 2    27-321 (parking regulations), 27-322 (parking 3    regulations), 27-324 (loading and unloading at an angle), 4    27-333 (wheel and axle loads), 27-334 (load restrictions 5    in the downtown district), 27-335 (load restrictions in 6    residential areas), 27-338 (width of vehicles), 27-339 7    (height of vehicles), 27-340 (length of vehicles), 27-352 8    (reflectors on trailers), 27-353 (mufflers), 27-354 9    (display of plates), 27-355 (display of city vehicle tax 10    sticker), 27-357 (identification of vehicles), 27-358 11    (projecting of loads), and also excepting the following 12    enumerated paragraphs of Section 2-201 of the Rules and 13    Regulations of the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority: 14    (l) (driving unsafe vehicle on tollway), (m) (vehicles 15    transporting dangerous cargo not properly indicated), it 16    shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which such 17    conviction is had within 5 days thereafter to forward to 18    the Secretary of State a report of the conviction and the 19    court may recommend the suspension of the driver's license 20    or permit of the person so convicted.21        The reporting requirements of this subsection shall 22    apply to all violations stated in paragraphs (1) and (2) 23    of this subsection when the individual has been 24    adjudicated under the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile 25    Court Act of 1987. Such reporting requirements shall also 26    apply to individuals adjudicated under the Juvenile Court   HB5281 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 who have committed a 2    violation of Section 11-501 of this Code, or similar 3    provision of a local ordinance, or Section 9-3 of the 4    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 5    relating to the offense of reckless homicide, or Section 6    5-7 of the Snowmobile Registration and Safety Act or 7    Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and Safety Act, 8    relating to the offense of operating a snowmobile or a 9    watercraft while under the influence of alcohol, other 10    drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or 11    combination thereof. These reporting requirements also 12    apply to individuals adjudicated under the Juvenile Court 13    Act of 1987 based on any offense determined to have been 14    committed in furtherance of the criminal activities of an 15    organized gang, as provided in Section 5-710 of that Act, 16    if those activities involved the operation or use of a 17    motor vehicle. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the 18    court in which adjudication is had within 5 days 19    thereafter to forward to the Secretary of State a report 20    of the adjudication and the court order requiring the 21    Secretary of State to suspend the minor's driver's license 22    and driving privilege for such time as determined by the 23    court, but only until he or she attains the age of 18 24    years. All juvenile court dispositions reported to the 25    Secretary of State under this provision shall be processed 26    by the Secretary of State as if the cases had been   HB5281 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    adjudicated in traffic or criminal court. However, 2    information reported relative to the offense of reckless 3    homicide, or Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar 4    provision of a local ordinance, shall be privileged and 5    available only to the Secretary of State, courts, and 6    police officers.7        The reporting requirements of this subsection (a) 8    apply to all violations listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) 9    of this subsection (a), excluding parking violations, when 10    the driver holds a CLP or CDL, regardless of the type of 11    vehicle in which the violation occurred, or when any 12    driver committed the violation in a commercial motor 13    vehicle as defined in Section 6-500 of this Code. 14        (3) Whenever an order is entered revoking pretrial 15    release given to secure appearance for any offense under 16    this Code or similar offenses under municipal ordinance, 17    it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which 18    such revocation was had or the judge of such court if such 19    court has no clerk, within 5 days thereafter to forward to 20    the Secretary of State a report of the revocation.21        (4) A report of any disposition of court supervision 22    for a violation of Sections 6-303, 11-401, 11-501 or a 23    similar provision of a local ordinance, 11-503, 11-504, 24    and 11-506 of this Code, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile 25    Registration and Safety Act, and Section 5-16 of the Boat 26    Registration and Safety Act shall be forwarded to the   HB5281 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    Secretary of State. A report of any disposition of court 2    supervision for a violation of an offense defined as a 3    serious traffic violation in this Code or a similar 4    provision of a local ordinance committed by a person under 5    the age of 21 years shall be forwarded to the Secretary of 6    State.7        (5) Reports of conviction under this Code and 8    sentencing hearings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 9    in an electronic format or a computer processible medium 10    shall be forwarded to the Secretary of State via the 11    Supreme Court in the form and format required by the 12    Illinois Supreme Court and established by a written 13    agreement between the Supreme Court and the Secretary of 14    State. In counties with a population over 300,000, instead 15    of forwarding reports to the Supreme Court, reports of 16    conviction under this Code and sentencing hearings under 17    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 in an electronic format or a 18    computer processible medium may be forwarded to the 19    Secretary of State by the Circuit Court Clerk in a form and 20    format required by the Secretary of State and established 21    by written agreement between the Circuit Court Clerk and 22    the Secretary of State. Failure to forward the reports of 23    conviction or sentencing hearing under the Juvenile Court 24    Act of 1987 as required by this Section shall be deemed an 25    omission of duty and it shall be the duty of the several 26    State's Attorneys to enforce the requirements of this   HB5281 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1    Section.2    (b) Whenever a restricted driving permit is forwarded to a 3court, as a result of confiscation by a police officer 4pursuant to the authority in Section 6-113(f), it shall be the 5duty of the clerk, or judge, if the court has no clerk, to 6forward such restricted driving permit and a facsimile of the 7officer's citation to the Secretary of State as expeditiously 8as practicable.9    (c) For the purposes of this Code, a revocation of 10pretrial release that has not been vacated, or the failure of a 11defendant to appear for trial after depositing his driver's 12license, shall be equivalent to a conviction.13    (d) For the purpose of providing the Secretary of State 14with records necessary to properly monitor and assess driver 15performance and assist the courts in the proper disposition of 16repeat traffic law offenders, the clerk of the court shall 17forward to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the 18Secretary, records of a driver's participation in a driver 19remedial or rehabilitative program which was required, through 20a court order or court supervision, in relation to the 21driver's arrest for a violation of Section 11-501 of this Code 22or a similar provision of a local ordinance. The clerk of the 23court shall also forward to the Secretary, either on paper or 24in an electronic format or a computer processible medium as 25required under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this 26Section, any disposition of court supervision for any traffic   HB5281 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1violation, excluding those offenses listed in paragraph (2) of 2subsection (a) of this Section. These reports shall be sent 3within 5 days after disposition, or, if the driver is referred 4to a driver remedial or rehabilitative program, within 5 days 5of the driver's referral to that program. These reports 6received by the Secretary of State, including those required 7to be forwarded under paragraph (a)(4), shall be privileged 8information, available only (i) to the affected driver, (ii) 9to the parent or guardian of a person under the age of 18 years 10holding an instruction permit or a graduated driver's license, 11and (iii) for use by the courts, police officers, prosecuting 12authorities, the Secretary of State, and the driver licensing 13administrator of any other state. In accordance with 49 C.F.R. 14Part 384, all reports of court supervision, except violations 15related to parking, shall be forwarded to the Secretary of 16State for all holders of a CLP or CDL or any driver who commits 17an offense while driving a commercial motor vehicle. These 18reports shall be recorded to the driver's record as a 19conviction for use in the disqualification of the driver's 20commercial motor vehicle privileges and shall not be 21privileged information.22    (e) For the purpose of providing the Secretary of State 23with records necessary to impose a revocation pursuant to 24paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 6-206, upon filing 25with the clerk of court, the clerk shall forward in a manner 26and form prescribed by the Secretary (i) a copy of a Uniform   HB5281 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 20653 LNS 34150 b1Citation and Complaint where the officer indicated a crash 2type of fatal, (ii) a copy of information or an indictment in 3which a person is charged with a violation of this Code that 4resulted in the death of another person, or (iii) a copy of 5information or an indictment in which a person is charged with 6reckless homicide in violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal 7Code of 2012. The Secretary shall adopt rules to implement 8this subsection. 9(Source: P.A. 101-623, eff. 7-1-20; 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 10102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 121, 2027.